Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3463.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 3.099, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Paydaysdeleted text begin ; mileage; per diemdeleted text end . new text begin (a) new text end The compensation of each member of the legislature is due on the first day of the regular legislative session of the term and payable in equal parts on January 15, in the first month of each term and on the first day of each following month during the term for which the member was elected. The compensation of each member of the legislature elected at a special election is due on the day the member takes the oath of office and payable within ten days of taking the oath for the remaining part of the month in which the oath was taken, and then in equal parts on the first day of each following month during the term for which the member was elected. deleted text begin Each member shall receive mileage for necessary travel to the place of meeting and returning to the member's residence in the amount and for trips as authorized by the senate for senate members and by the house of representatives for house members. deleted text end deleted text begin Each member shall also receive per diem living expenses during a regular or special session of the legislature in the amounts and for the purposes as determined by the senate for senate members and by the house of representatives for house members. deleted text end new text begin (b) new text end On January 15 in the first month of each term and on the first day of each following month, the secretary of the senate and the chief clerk of the house of representatives shall certify to the commissioner of management and budget, in duplicate, the amount of compensation then payable to each member of their respective houses and its total. Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 3.099, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 1a. new text end new text begin Payments; more than 50 miles. new text end new text begin A member who lives more than 50 miles from the state capitol building may, with caucus leader approval, receive the following payments: new text end new text begin (1) per diem payments in an amount determined by the body for each day the member is present at the capitol complex for legislative business; and new text end new text begin (2) when the member is present at the capitol complex for legislative business: new text end new text begin (i) round trip mileage from the capitol to the member's home once per calendar week if the member receives a housing stipend; or new text end new text begin (ii) round trip mileage from the capitol to the member's home for each day if the member does not receive a housing stipend. new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 3.099, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 1b. new text end new text begin Payments; 50 miles or less. new text end new text begin A member who lives 50 miles or less from the state capitol building may, with caucus leader approval, receive the following payments: new text end new text begin (1) a meal stipend for each meal when the member is present on the capitol complex for legislative business. Meal stipends must be paid at a rate and consistent with the Legislative Coordinating Commission's policy on meal reimbursement for in-state travel; and new text end new text begin (2) round trip mileage from the capitol to the member's home for each day the member is present at the capitol complex for legislative business. new text end Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 3.103, is amended to read: 3.103 SPECIAL SESSION LIVING EXPENSES. Each member of the legislature, during a special session, shall be reimbursed for expenses incurred in the performance of duties in the same amounts, for the same purposes, and in the same manner as authorized for senators and members of the house of representatives at the last regular session before the special session. deleted text begin Reimbursement for travel shall not exceed one round trip per member for each seven calendar days in which the legislature meets in the special session.deleted text end